ru: Направление древесных волокон: Текстура на кромке; Текстура на торце; Лицевая текстура; Другое
tr: Ahşap damar yönü: Kenar lifli; Uçtan lifli; Yüzey lifli; Diğer
nb: Trefibrenes retning: Kantved; Endeved; Sideved; Annet
bg-BG: Ориентация на дървесните влакна: Към ръба; Към края; Лицево; Друго
en: Wood grain orientation: Edge grain; End grain; Face grain; Other
lt-LT: Medienos plaušo kryptis: Kraštinio pjūvio raštas; Šoninio pjūvio raštas; Paviršinis medienos raštas; Kita
da: Træs åreretning: Kantåre; Endeåre; Ansigtsøre; Andet
sk-SK: Orientácia drevených vlákien: Radiálny rez; Priečny rez; Lícna strana; Iné
hr-HR: Orijentacija drvenih vlakana: Edge grain; End grain; Face grain; Ostalo
cs: Orientace dřevních vláken: Krajní řez; Příčný řez; Podélný řez; Jiné
hu: Fa erezetének orientációja: Szél erezete; Alj erezete; Színoldal erezete; Egyéb
zh-CN: 木纹方向: 侧面纹理; 端面纹理; 表面纹理; 其他
th: ทิศทางลายไม้: ลายไม้ตามแนวขอบ; ลายไม้หน้าตัดปลายเสี้ยน; ลายไม้หน้าแผ่น; อื่นๆ
fr: Sens du grain du bois: Grain sur quartier; Grain de bout; Grain sur face; Autre
fi: Puun syysuunta: Reunasyy; Päätysyy; Pintasyy; Muu
es: Orientación de la veta de la madera: Grano del borde; Grano final; Grano de la cara; Otros
ja: 木目の向き (木口、柾目、板目): エッジグレイン; エンドグレイン; フェイスグレイン; その他
nl: Houtnerfrichting: Langshout; Kopshout; Vlak hout; Overig
it: Orientamento delle venature del legno: Grana del bordo; Grano finale; Grana del viso; Altro
sv: Träfiberriktning: Kantfibrer; Ändved; Ytved; Annat
pt-PT: Orientação dos veios da madeira: Veio de bordo; Veio de topo; Veio de face; Outro
el: Κατεύθυνση νερών ξύλου: Κόκκος άκρης; Τελικός κόκκος; Κόκκος προσώπου; Άλλο
vi: Hướng vân gỗ: Thớ gỗ dọc; Thớ gỗ ngang; Thớ gỗ bề mặt; Khác
ko: 목재 결 방향: 측면 결; 수직 결; 표면 결; 기타
sl-SI: Orientacija lesnih vlaken: Robna zrnatost; Končno zrno; Zrnatost obraza; Druga
pt-BR: Orientação dos veios da madeira: Grão de topo; Grãoa transversal; Grão longitudinal; Outro
ro-RO: Orientarea fibrei lemnului: Fibra cantului; Fibra capătului; Fibra feței; Altele
pl: Orientacja słojów drewna: Słoje wzdłużne; Słoje poprzeczne; Słoje powierzchniowe; Inne
de: Holzmaserungsausrichtung: Seitenholz; Hirnholz; Flächenmaserung; Sonstiges
zh-TW: 木紋方向: 豎直紋理; 端紋; 面紋; 其他